Maryland, session 2025, SB0291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
SUBTITLE 5. PETITION TO REDUCE SENTENCE.
8–501.
(A) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO IS SERVING A TERM OF CONFINEMENT MAY PETITION THE COURT
TO REDUCE THE SENTENCE OR SENTENCES IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SERVED AT LEAST 20 YEARS OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S TERM OF CONFINEMENT; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0291*

SENATE BILL 291
(II) AT LEAST 3 YEARS HAVE PASSED SINCE THE COURT
DECIDED ANY PETITION PREVIOUSLY FILED BY THE INDIVIDUAL UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, IF THE COURT DENIES OR GRANTS IN PART A PETITION TO REDUCE A
SENTENCE OR SENTENCES UNDER THIS SECTION, THE INDIVIDUAL WHO FILED THE
PETITION MAY NOT FILE A SUBSEQUENT PETITION TO REDUCE THE SENTENCE OR
SENTENCES FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS.
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT FILE MORE THAN THREE
PETITIONS TO REDUCE THE SAME SENTENCE OR SENTENCES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL FILE A PETITION TO REDUCE A SENTENCE
OR SENTENCES UNDER THIS SECTION IN THE CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN
WHICH THE SENTENCE OR SENTENCES WERE IMPOSED.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS ELIGIBLE FOR COURT RECONSIDERATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
SENTENCE OR SENTENCES IF A STATE’S ATTORNEY FILES A MOTION TO REDUCE THE
SENTENCE OR SENTENCES DURING THE INDIVIDUAL’S INCARCERATION IN THE
CIRCUIT COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE SENTENCE OR SENTENCES WERE
IMPOSED.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
COURT SHALL HOLD A HEARING ON A PETITION TO REDUCE A SENTENCE OR
SENTENCES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE HEARING REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE HELD AFTER:
(I) THE COURT HAS DETERMINED THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS
ELIGIBLE TO FILE A PETITION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) THE STATE FILES A MOTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4) OF
THIS SECTION.
(3) NOTICE OF THE HEARING UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE GIVEN
TO THE VICTIM OR THE VICTIM’S REPRESENTATIVE UNDER §§ 11–104 AND 11–503
OF THIS ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 291 3
(4) (I) THE INDIVIDUAL MAY INTRODUCE EVIDENCE IN SUPPORT
OF THE PETITION AT THE HEARING.
(II) THE STATE MAY INTRODUCE EVIDENCE IN SUPPORT OF OR
IN OPPOSITION TO THE PETITION AT THE HEARING.
(5) (I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO FILES A PETITION UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY WAIVE THE RIGHT TO BE PRESENT AT A HEARING HELD UNDER THIS
SECTION.
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO FILES A PETITION UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY ELECT TO BE PRESENT AT THE HEARING BY VIDEO CONFERENCE.
(C) (1) IF A HEARING IS HELD UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL
STATE THE REASONS FOR ITS DECISION WHETHER OR NOT TO REDUCE THE
PETITIONER’S SENTENCE OR SENTENCES:
(I) ON THE RECORD AND IN OPEN COURT AT THE HEARING; OR
(II) ISSUED IN WRITING WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE
CONCLUSION OF THE HEARING.
(2) THE COURT’S DECISION IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL ADDRESS EACH OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL’S AGE AT THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE;
(II) THE NATURE OF THE OFFENSE AND THE HISTORY AND
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
(III) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SUBSTANTIALLY COMPLIED
WITH THE RULES OF THE INSTITUTION IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL HAS BEEN
CONFINED;
(IV) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS PARTICIPATED IN AN
EDUCATIONAL, VOCATIONAL, OR OTHER PROGRAM;
(V) WHETHER THE INDIVIDUAL HAS DEMONSTRATED
MATURITY, REHABILITATION, AND FITNESS TO REENTER SOCIETY SUFFICIENT TO
JUSTIFY A SENTENCE REDUCTION;
(VI) ANY STATEMENT OFFERED BY A VICTIM OR A VICTIM’S
REPRESENTATIVE;

SENATE BILL 291
(VII) ANY REPORT OF A PHYSICAL, MENTAL, OR BEHAVIORAL
EXAMINATION OF THE INDIVIDUAL CONDUCTED BY A HEALTH PROFESSIONAL;
(VIII) THE INDIVIDUAL’S FAMILY AND COMMUNITY
CIRCUMSTANCES AT THE TIME OF THE OFFENSE, INCLUDING ANY HISTORY OF
TRAUMA, ABUSE, OR INVOLVEMENT IN THE CHILD WELFARE SYSTEM;
(IX) THE EXTENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S ROLE IN THE OFFENSE;
AND
(X) ANY OTHER FACTOR THE COURT CONSIDERS RELEVANT.
(3) (I) AFTER A HEARING UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY
REDUCE A SENTENCE OR SENTENCES IMPOSED ON AN INDIVIDUAL IF THE COURT
FINDS THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A DANGER TO THE PUBLIC AND THE INTERESTS
OF JUSTICE WILL BE BETTER SERVED BY A REDUCED SENTENCE OR SENTENCES.
(II) IF THE INDIVIDUAL HAS SERVED A TERM OF CONFINEMENT
OF 30 YEARS OR MORE, OR IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS AT LEAST 60 YEARS OLD, THERE
SHALL BE A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL IS NOT A DANGER
TO THE PUBLIC.
(D) THE FOLLOWING MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED AGAINST THE INDIVIDUAL
PETITIONING FOR REDUCTION OF A SENTENCE OR SENTENCES:
(1) THE LIMITED AVAILABILITY OR ACCESSIBILITY OF
REHABILITATIVE PROGRAMS; OR
(2) THE INDIVIDUAL’S CLAIMS OF INNOCENCE.
(E) A COURT MAY NOT INCREASE THE LENGTH OF SENTENCE OR
SENTENCES UNDER THIS SECTION.
(F) THE RIGHT TO SEEK A REDUCTION IN SENTENCE OR SENTENCES UNDER
THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE WAIVED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply to:
(1) any individual serving a term of confinement in the State who was
sentenced on or before the effective date of this Act; and

SENATE BILL 291 5
(2) any individual who will serve a term of confinement in the State who is
sentenced after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.